src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! HÖGST temporärt!!! GE + LL 230208
LEXICON n1_troppi
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N+Sg+Nom:       PxK ; !! troppi
+N+Nom: R ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG%>n R ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG%>n PxK ; !! tropin
+N+Sg+Par:%>^A PxK ; !! troppia?
+N+Sg+Ill:^HMETA%>h^V^V n_PxK ; ! trophiin
+N+Sg+Ill:^HMET2%>h^V^V n_PxK ; ! trophiin
+N+Sg+Ine:^WG%>ss^A PxK ;       ! tropissa
+N+Sg+Ela:^WG%>st^A PxK ;       ! tropista
+N+Sg+All:^WG%>le PxxK ;        ! tropile
+N+Sg+Ade:^WG%>l^A PxK ;        ! tropila
+N+Sg+Abl:^WG%>lt^A PxK ;       ! tropilta
+N+Sg+Tra:^WG TRA ;             ! tropiksi
+N+Sg+Ess:%>n^A PxK ;           ! troppina
+N+Sg+Abe:^WG%>tt^A PxK ;       ! tropitta

+N+Pl+Nom:^WG%>t PxK ;
+N+Pl+Gen:^WG^IDEL%>i2tten PxK ; ! nu: troppitten rätt: tropitten
+N+Pl+Gen:^IDEL%>i2en PxK ;
+N+Pl+Par:%>^A PxK ; ! nu: --- rätt (kanske samma som Sg?) :	troppia?
+N+Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>h^Vi n_PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ill:^HMET2%>h^Vi n_PxK ;  
+N+Pl+Ine:^WG%>ss^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ela:^WG%>st^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+All:^WG%>le PxxK ;
+N+Pl+Ade:^WG%>l^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Abl:^WG%>lt^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Tra:^WG%> TRA ;
+N+Pl+Ess:%>n^A PxK ;     ! nu rätt: troppina
+N+Pl+Abe:^WG%>tt^A PxK ;
 
LEXICON n1_troppi_odd
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N+Sg+Nom:       PxK ; !! 
+N+Nom: R ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG%>n R ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG%>n PxK ; !! 
+N+Sg+Par:%>^A PxK ; !! 
+N+Sg+Ill:^HMETA%>h^V^V n_PxK ; ! 
+N+Sg+Ill:^HMET2%>h^V^V n_PxK ; ! 
+N+Sg+Ine:^WG%>ss^A PxK ;       ! 
+N+Sg+Ela:^WG%>st^A PxK ;       ! 
+N+Sg+All:^WG%>lle PxxK ;        ! sapattille
+N+Sg+Ade:^WG%>ll^A PxK ;        ! 
+N+Sg+Abl:^WG%>lt^A PxK ;       ! 
+N+Sg+Tra:^WG TRA ;             ! 
+N+Sg+Ess:%>nn^A PxK ;           ! 
+N+Sg+Abe:^WG%>tt^A PxK ;       ! 

+N+Pl+Nom:^WG%>t PxK ;
+N+Pl+Gen:^WG^IDEL%>i2tten PxK ; !
+N+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:^IDEL%>i2en PxK ;
+N+Pl+Par:%>^A PxK ; ! 
+N+Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>h^Vi n_PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ill:^HMET2%>h^Vi n_PxK ;  
+N+Pl+Ine:^WG%>ss^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ela:^WG%>st^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+All:^WG%>lle PxxK ;
+N+Pl+Ade:^WG%>ll^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Abl:^WG%>lt^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Tra:^WG%> TRA ;
+N+Pl+Ess:%>nn^A PxK ;     !
+N+Pl+Abe:^WG%>tt^A PxK ;
