src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!≈ * **@CODE@**
äkseerinki:äkseerinki n1_troppi ;
piili:piili n1_troppi ;
trolli:trolli n1_troppi ;
kontrolli:kontrolli n1_troppi ;
malmi:malmi n1_troppi ;
tuhkamalmi:tuhka#malmi n1_troppi ;
vaskimalmi:vaski#malmi n1_troppi ;
verimalmi:veri#malmi n1_troppi ;
irtimalmi:irti#malmi n1_troppi ;
magneettimalmi:magneetti#malmi n1_troppi ;
plyyerttimalmi:plyyertti#malmi n1_troppi ;
tulikivimalmi:tuli#kivi#malmi n1_troppi ;
a-malmi:a-malmi n1_troppi ;
kumppani:kumppani n1_troppi_odd ;
matkakumppani:matka#kumppani n1_troppi_odd ;
vellikumppani:velli#kumppani n1_troppi_odd ;
kasvinkumppani:kasvin#kumppani n1_troppi_odd ;
piippukumppani:piippu#kumppani n1_troppi_odd ;
pappi:pappi n1_troppi ;
ylipappi:yli#pappi n1_troppi ;
troppi:troppi n1_troppi ;   ! GE & LL labbar
äijäfaari:äijä#faari n1_troppi ;
kamari:kamari n1_troppi_odd ;
karjanviljakamari:karjanvilja#kamari n1_troppi_odd ;
viinakamari:viina#kamari n1_troppi_odd ;
kolpakamari:kolpa#kamari n1_troppi_odd ;
vaatekamari:vaate#kamari n1_troppi_odd ;
fiilikamari:fiili#kamari n1_troppi_odd ;
luhtikamari:luhti#kamari n1_troppi_odd ;
porstuankamari:porstuan#kamari n1_troppi_odd ;
tallinkamari:tallin#kamari n1_troppi_odd ;
maitokamari:maito#kamari n1_troppi_odd ;
makkuukamari:makkuu#kamari n1_troppi_odd ;
porstuamperäkamari:porstuamperä#kamari n1_troppi_odd ;
Kyriiri:Kyriiri n1_troppi_odd ;
kulttuuri:kulttuuri n1_troppi_odd ; !n5_ie_odd ;
kursi:kursi n1_troppi ;
resyrsi:resyrsi n1_troppi_odd ;
alunastifti:aluna#stifti n1_troppi ;
stipenti:stipent2i n1_troppi_odd ;
TV-masti:TV-masti n1_troppi ;
jyristi:jyristi n1_troppi_odd ;
tyristi:tyristi n1_troppi_odd ;
nasisti:nasisti n1_troppi_odd ;
abortti:abortti n1_troppi ;
periuuti:periuut2i n1_troppi ;
projekti:projekti n1_troppi_odd ;
prujekti:prujekti n1_troppi_odd ;
sapatti:sapatti n1_troppi_odd ;
